Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.857

Faculty tenure—Decision not to renew probationary appointment, notice by appointing authority, when.

Upon the decision not to renew a probationary faculty appointment, the appointing authority shall notify the probationer of such decision as soon as possible during the regular college year: PROVIDED, That such notice may not be given later than one complete quarter, except summer quarter, before the expiration of the probationary faculty appointment.

[ 1991 c 294 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 37. Formerly RCW 28.85.857.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Effective date, application—Severability—1991 c 294: See notes following RCW 28B.50.851.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.